Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Article 1. General Provisions

§ 3381.
Maintenance of pounds.

Each organized town shall maintain as many good and sufficient pounds as it may need for the impounding of animals liable to be impounded.
(a) (1) Each organized town shall maintain as many good and sufficient pounds as it may need for the impounding of animals liable to be impounded.

The pound may be kept in an adjacent town if the adjacent town consents and the poundkeeper may be a resident of an adjacent town.

Each town may regulate the operation of its pounds except as to matters regulated by law.

HISTORY:

Amended

1963, No. 74

, § 1;

2017, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 9.

§ 3382.
Repealed. 2017, No. 130 (Adj. Sess.), § 9.

§ 3383.
Impounding when no pounds.

If a town does not have such pound, a person wishing to impound an animal may use his or her barn or some other enclosure for that purpose, notifying the owner of such animal where the same is impounded.

§ 3384.
Security to poundkeeper.

When a person impounds an animal, the poundkeeper may require sufficient security to indemnify him or her for liability for detaining the animal and for supplying it with food and drink while in the pound.
If the person so impounding does not furnish such security within 24 hours, he or she may release the animal and deliver the same to the owner or keeper, and the person impounding the animal shall be liable to the poundkeeper for his or her costs, trouble, and expense.